Hawaii, session 2026, GM1305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that providing explicit •
authority to the board of land and natural resources to enter
into community co-management agreements honors the Native
Hawaiian concepts of malama aina and ahupuaa-based management,
promoting more effective stewardship of public trust resources
for present and future generations.
The legislature further finds that grassroots communities
across the State, including Haena, Pupukea, Moomomi, Kipahulu,
Hookena, Kaupulehu, and Kealakekua, have spent decades
collaborating with government agencies to care for wahi pana and
surrounding resources.. These efforts would be more effective
and sustainable if supported by long-term community
co-management agreements.
Although community-government partnerships exist through
curatorships, revocable permits, and concession agreements, the
lack of statutory authority and a formalized process limits
their effectiveness. For example, the Hui Makaainana o Makaha
2026-3489 HB2218 CDl HMSO 1

Page 2
H.B. NO.
^*2
C.D. 1
has worked since 1998 to steward Haena state park and perpetuate
ike kupuna. The board of land and natural resources approved
entering into a concession agreement, yet has not secured a
long-term co-management agreement with the Hui. Other aina-
based organizations face similar challenges.
Community-based co-management has also been successful in
fisheries through the community-based subsistence fishing area
framework. Communities in Haena, Milolii, Kipahulu, and
Kealakekua have established community-based subsistence fishing
areas, and additional communities are organizing, all of which
would benefit from long-term co-management agreements.
The legislature further finds that the State alone cannot
sustainably manage the State's public trust resources and that
place-based Native Hawaiian and local communities provide
essential stewardship, capacity, and local knowledge.
Article XI, section 1, and article XII, section 7, of the Hawaii
State Constitution support co-management agreements as a means
of restoring and protecting biocultural public trust resources
for future generations, including for subsistence, cultural, and
religious purposes.
The purpose of this Act is to:
2026-3489 HB2218 CDl HMSO
iHiwniiiiiiiinniniiii

Page 3 ■ ■ |l i 2218
H.B. NO.
h°.2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(1) Authorize the board of land and natural resources to
enter into community co-management agreements;
(2) Establish qualifications for eligible community
co-managers; and
(3) Authorize the disposition of public lands by a
community co-management agreement.
SECTION 2. Chapter 171, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and
to read as follows:
"PART COMMUNITY CO-MANAGEMENT
§171-A Findings and puzrpose. The legislature finds that
providing specific authority to the board of land and natural
resources to enter into community co-management agreements with
community-based organizations honors the traditional Native
Hawaiian concept of malama aina and place-based practices for
natural and cultural resource management, promoting more
effective protection of the State's public trust resources for
the benefit of present and future generations.
§171-B Definitions. Notwithstanding any other definition
to the contrary provided in this chapter, as used in this part:
2026-3489 HB2218 CDl HMSO

Page 4 ■ ■ 2218
H.B. NO.
h°2
C.D. 1
"Aina education" means learning pathways that are guided
and grounded in geographic place, aina and kai, and Native
Hawaiian values, language, culture, and history.
"Community-based organization" means a nonprofit
corporation incorporated in the State that has a mission,
capacity, and commitment to malama aina; care for natural and
cultural resources; and engage in community-driven planning,
management, and projects that benefit public trust resources.
"Community co-management unit" means the location and
boundaries of the land subject to a community co-management
agreement.
"Land" means all interests therein and natural resources
including water, streams, shorelines out to a mile or the
fringing reef, ocean minerals, and all things connected with
land, unless otherwise expressly provided.
§171-C Community co-management agreements. (a) The board
may enter into community co-management agreements, by direct
negotiation and without recourse to public auction, with
qualified community-based organizations to implement this part.
2026-3489 HB2218 CDl HMSO

Page 5 2218
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(b) Community co-management agreements shall be used
solely and exclusively for one or more of the following
purposes:
(1) Preservation and practice of all rights customarily
and traditionally exercised by Native Hawaiians for
subsistence, cultural, and religious purposes;
(2) Preservation, protection, and restoration of
archaeological, historical, and environmental
resources;
(3) Rehabilitation, revegetation, restoration, and
preservation of native species and habitats;
(4) Management of parking, visitor activities, and public
and recreational parks and facilities in conjunction
with malama aina-focused principles; or
(5) Aina education;
provided that no community co-management agreement shall
allocate the sharing of management functions and
responsibilities and the rights of entry and use for a given
community co-management unit under the jurisdiction of the
department for a period of time exceeding sixty-five years.
2026-3489 HB2218 CDl HMSO 5
iniinimiiiiHiniiuiii

Page 6 2218
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(c) The board shall consider the following when deciding
whether a community-based organization is qualified to enter
into a community co-management agreement:
Nonprofit status and mission;
(2) A list and qualifications of board members and staff;
(3) A summary of past and current projects in the proposed
community co-management unit, including those in
partnership with community groups, and federal, state
and county governments;
A description of the location and boundaries of the
community co-management unit;
Justification for the proposed community co-management
agreement;
Other information deemed necessary for consideration;
and
(7) A co-management plan recommended by the department
containing a description of the:
(A) Specific place-based, mission-driven, and
community-led activities to be conducted in the
area that sustain community, natural, and
cultural resources;
2026-3489 HB2218 CDl HMSO 6
niiMiiiiiniiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 7 2218
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D.2
C.D. 1
(B) Demonstrated commitment to the use and knowledge
of customary and traditional Native Hawaiian
practices, understandings, and values as a core
component of the plan;
(C) Use of adaptive practices and responses to
changing conditions;
(D) Defined management functions, roles, and
responsibilities;
(E) Performance and accountability standards for
monitoring, evaluation, and revenue generation,
if any;
(F) Reporting processes and requirements;
(G) Parameters for equitable data collection,
sharing, and rights;
(H) Dispute resolution pathways;
(I) Methods of funding and enforcement; and
(J) Other information deemed necessary to support the
application.
(d) Every ten years, beginning from the effective date of
the community co-management agreement, the department shall
submit to the board for its review a report detailing the
2026-3489 HB2218 GDI HMSO 7

Page 8 ■ ■ 2218
H.B. NO.
ho.2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
community-based organization's progress on meeting the goals set
out in the co-management plan. The board may make any
applicable amendments to the co-management plan or terminate the
community co-management agreement.
(e) Notwithstanding subsection (d), a community-based
organization or the board, upon written notice, may terminate
the community co-management agreement, subject to the terms of
the community co-management agreement.
(f) The department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91
to implement this part."
SECTION 3. Section 171-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding two new definitions to be appropriately
inserted and to read as follows:
""Community co-management" means collaboration between the
department and one or more community-based organizations, under
a community co-management agreement, to allocate the sharing of
management functions and responsibilities and the rights of
entry and use for a given community co-management unit under the
jurisdiction of the department.
2026-3489 HB2218 CDl HMSO

Page 9 2218
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
"Community co-management agreement" means a written
agreement between the board and a community-based organization
for community co-management pursuant to this chapter."
SECTION 4. Section 171-13, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§171-13 Disposition of public lands. Except as otherwise
provided by law and subject to other provisions of this chapter,
the board may:
(1) Dispose of public land in fee simple, by lease, lease
with option to purchase, license, community
co-management agreement, or permit; and
(2) Grant easement by direct negotiation or otherwise for
particular purposes in perpetuity on such terms as may
be set by the board, subject to reverter to the State
upon termination or abandonment of the specific
purpose for which it was granted, provided the sale
price of such easement shall be determined pursuant to
section 171-17 (b) .
No person shall be eligible to purchase or lease public lands,
or to be granted a license, community co-management agreement,
permit, or easement covering public lands, who has had during
2026-3489 HB2218 GDI HMSO


Page 10
H.B. NO. S.
C.D. 1
the five years preceding the date of disposition a previous
sale, lease, license, community co-management agreement, permit,
or easement covering public lands canceled for failure to
satisfy the terms and conditions thereof."
SECTION 5. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3489 HB2218 CDl HMSO

niiHiiiiiiiiiiiinniii

H.B. NO. 2218
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 8th day of July ,2026

HB No. 2218, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2218, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
171-26